task.lexd
PATTERNS
NumStem NumCase
NumStem NumNumber NumCase
Ten TenCase
Ten NumNumber TenCase
( NumStem | Ten ) OrdSuffix
( NumStem | Ten ) AdvSuffix
( NumStem | Ten ) Distributive

LEXICON NumStem
сад:са{Д} #1
Iуд:Iу{Д} #2
хьибуд:хьибу{Д} #3
якьуд:якьу{Д} #4
гIафуд:гIафу{Д} #5
ерхьид:ерхьи{Д} #6
ерид:ери{Д} #7
муйд:муй{Д} #8
ярчIуд:ярчIу{Д} #9
ицIуд:ицIу{Д} #10
къад #20

LEXICON Ten
хьимцIур #30
ягьцIур #40
гIафцIур #50
яхьцIур #60
ярцIур #70
муйцIур #80
ярчIзур #90

LEXICON NumCase
<nom>:
<erg>:и
<gen>:ин
<dat>:ис
<ins>:илди
<psl1>:ифай
<psl2>:ихъай
<psl3>:игIай

LEXICON TenCase
<nom>:
<erg>:а
<gen>:ан
<dat>:ас
<ins>:алди
<psl1>:афай
<psl2>:ахъай
<psl3>:агIай

LEXICON NumNumber
<sg>:
<pl>:ар

LEXICON OrdSuffix
<ord>:пуф

LEXICON OrdCase
<nom>:
<erg>:ти
<gen>:тин
<dat>:тис
<ins>:тилди
<psl1>:тифай
<psl2>:тихъай
<psl3>:тигIай


LEXICON AdvSuffix
<adv>:{X}галай

LEXICON Distributive
<distr>:
<distr>:ди
